North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 2. Reports.

§ 55A-16-20.
Financial statements for members.

Except as provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws of a charitable or religious corporation, a corporation upon written demand from a member shall furnish that member its latest annual financial statements, if any, which may be consolidated or combined statements of the corporation and one or more of its subsidiaries or affiliates, as appropriate, that include a balance sheet as of the end of the fiscal year and statement of operations for that year. If financial statements are prepared for the corporation on the basis of generally accepted accounting principles, the annual financial statements shall also be prepared on that basis.

If annual financial statements are reported upon by a public accountant, the accountant’s report shall accompany them. If not, the statements must be accompanied by the statement of the president or the person responsible for the corporation’s financial accounting records:

Stating the president’s or other person’s reasonable belief as to whether the statements were prepared on the basis of generally accepted accounting principles and, if not, describing the basis of preparation; and

Describing any respects in which the statements were not prepared on a basis of accounting consistent with the statements prepared for the preceding year.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

A nonprofit corporation is not required to have financial statements but, if it elects to have them, subsection [subdivision] (e)(5) generally requires them to be kept at the principal office and G.S. 55A-16-02(a) makes them available for inspection by members. However, in addition to its general right not to have any financial statements at all, a charitable or religious corporation may provide in its articles of incorporation or bylaws that it will not furnish financial statements to its members. In that case, members will not have inspection rights with respect to the financial statements. See G.S. 55A-16-01(e)(5) and G.S. 55A-16-02(a).

§ 55A-16-21.
Notice of indemnification to members.

If a corporation indemnifies or advances expenses to a director under

G.S. 55A-8-51

, 55A-8-52, 55A-8-53, 55A-8-54, or 55A-8-57 in connection with a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation, the corporation shall give notice of the indemnification or advance in writing to the members with or before the notice of the next meeting of members.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

This section had no counterpart in the prior law.

§ 55A-16-22.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 539, s. 8.

§ 55A-16-23.
Principal office address.

Any corporation that does not designate the street address and the mailing address, if different from the street address, of the corporation’s principal office and the county of location in an annual report or its articles of incorporation shall file a Designation of Principal Office Address form with the Secretary of State that contains that information.

A corporation may change its principal office by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing a Corporation’s Statement of Change of Principal Office form that sets forth:

The street address, and the mailing address if different from the street address, of the corporation’s current principal office and the county in which it is located; and

The street address, and the mailing address if different from the street address, of the new principal office and the county in which it is located.

History.

1995, c. 539, s. 21; 2001-358, s. 48(d); 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

§ 55A-16-24.
Financial statements for the public.

Notwithstanding any provisions in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, a corporation that receives over five thousand dollars ($5,000) of public funding within a fiscal year, including the amount of grants or loans and the value of any in-kind donations, from a local government, the State, or the federal government shall provide its latest annual financial statements upon written demand from any member of the public. The statements shall be substantively similar to those required under

G.S. 55A-16-20

but shall contain additional details about the amount of public funds received and how those funds were used. Additionally, a corporation that receives public funding shall provide, upon written demand from any member of the public, a copy of its most recently completed and filed Internal Revenue Service Form 990 or Form 990-EZ, except of any information not required for public disclosure pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 6104(d)(3), or a copy of the message confirming the corporation’s submission of Internal Revenue Service Form 990-N. A corporation may comply with the provisions of this section by maintaining on its public Web site a financial report as described in this section and a copy of its most recent Internal Revenue Service Form 990, Form 990-EZ, or Form 990-N submission confirmation or by having such materials posted, as part of a database of similar documents of other tax-exempt organization, on a Web site established and maintained by another entity, provided that the entity does not charge a fee to access the information and provided that the corporation provides a link on its public Web site to the Web site maintained by the other entity.

Exceptions. — The following corporations already required to report information shall not be subject to subsection (a) of this section, but shall provide information on their public Web site to whom the corporation reports its information and how to access that information:

A corporation required to report to the North Carolina Medical Care Commission of the Department of Health and Human Services.

A corporation required to report to the Local Government Commission of the Department of State Treasurer.

A private college that meets the definition of “institution” under

G.S. 116-22

and is required to report to the State under

G.S. 143C-6-23

.

History.

2012-169, s. 1.